Hawaii statutes.
[§651C-10] Supplement of provisions.
Unless displaced by the provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and
equity, including the law merchant and the law relating to principal and agent,
estoppel, laches, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake,
insolvency, or other validating or invalidating cause, supplement its
provisions. [L 1985, c 216, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Petitioners were entitled to a variety of means (§§651C-7 and
651C-8 and this section) to secure a full recovery of their losses from
respondent and/or the asset fraudulently transferred to respondent, but only
once, not twice; moreover, nothing in this chapter requires petitioners to
elect one remedy over another. This chapter does not, however, allow
petitioners recovery of both the asset transferred (regardless of its value)
and, in addition, a judgment in the full amount of their damages. 130 H. 58
(App.), 305 P.3d 474 (2013).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next